Hawaii, session 2026, SB2974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's ocean waters and the marine resources contained within are some of the State's most ecologically, economically, and culturally valuable environmental assets.  The rising popularity of marine ecotourism combined with the growing threats of climate change threaten the overall health of Hawaii's marine ecosystems. Accordingly, to protect Hawaii's coastal waters, the legislature passed Act 46, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, to create the ocean stewardship special fund for the conservation, restoration, and enhancement of the State's marine resources. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the ocean stewardship special fund to expand its authorized usage to include planning, development, designing, or implementation of beach restoration projects, including the awarding of grants to nonprofit organizations for beach and nearshore environmental cleanup. SECTION 2.  Section 187A-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  Subject to subsection (d), the ocean stewardship special fund shall be used to: (1)  Develop and carry out marine resource conservation, restoration, enhancement, research, regulatory measures, enforcement actions, educational activities, or any other management measure intended to conserve, restore, and enhance marine resources under the jurisdiction of the State; (2)  Develop and carry out restoration and compensatory mitigation measures for impacts to the marine environment, including impacts to the marine environment from federal or state permitted actions, or violations of subtitle 5 of title 12 or any rule adopted thereunder; [and] (3)  Install, maintain, and replace day use mooring buoys and other infrastructure to reduce impacts to the marine ecosystem[.]; and (4)  Plan, design, develop, or implement beach restoration projects, including the awarding of grants to nonprofit organizations for beach and nearshore environmental cleanup." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________